Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 2. Delegates to National Convention; Presidential Nominations

§ 2715.
Party convention to elect delegates.

The State committee of each major political party holding a national convention shall call a party convention, under rules proposed in advance and adopted by the committee, to be held during the month of May or June in each presidential election year. At the convention, delegates and alternates to the national convention of such party, to the number apportioned to this State, shall be elected by the rules adopted by each major political party.

Each major political party shall adopt rules relating to the delegates and alternates of a candidate who has withdrawn as a candidate. A declaration of withdrawal shall be made in writing and becomes effective when filed with the Secretary of State.

Each major political party shall adopt rules relating to the manner in which the delegates elected in accordance with this section shall represent, at the national convention, the voters for whom the delegates were elected.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 1980; amended

1991, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 10, 1992;

1995, No. 38

, § 7.

§ 2716.
Notification to Secretary of State.

Not later than 5:00 p.m. on the 65th day before the day of the general election, the chair of the State committee of each major political party shall certify in writing to the Secretary of State the names of the presidential and vice presidential nominees selected at the party’s national convention.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 199

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 6, 1980; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 60;

2017, No. 50

, § 63.